Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1244
Motorboat; engine equipped with flame arrester or similar device; exception.

Every motorboat shall have the carburetor or carburetors of every engine therein, except outboard motors, using gasoline as fuel, equipped with such efficient flame arrester, backfire trap, or other similar device as may be prescribed by the regulations of the commission.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 44.